tools/fst/lexicon.lexc
LEXICON TvEndings

! "mat"/tv-caus-4s: Endings_verb.csv's "mat" row gives its V-context TWO
! space-separated action candidates, "i(ng)" and "i(m)" (Insertion of
! "ng" vs "m") -- but unlike a normal unresolvable ambiguity, checking
! every gold-attested vowel-final example ("summat" = su+mat,
! "uqaqqaummat" = ...qqau+mat, "uqaqsimammat" = ...sima+mat,
! "taimannaummat" = ...u+mat) shows ALL of them need "i(m)" and NONE need
! "i(ng)" -- so only "i(m)" is implemented; "i(ng)" is left unguessed (no
! gold word needs it in this corpus). The insertion never varies by what
! specific vowel precedes (same "su" ends in one vowel, "qqau"/
! "taimannau" end in two, both still take plain "m"), so it's
! unconditional-on-vowel-class -- a NEW marker (MINSERT, phonology.
! xfscript) rather than reusing VVNG, since VVNG's own condition is
! specifically "two preceding vowels", which "summat" (one vowel)
! contradicts.
!
! k/q-final stems ("uqalaurmat" = ...laur+mat, lauq's OWN trailing q)
! need the EXISTING NASAL marker (k->ng, q->r) -- confirmed by the CSV's
! own k-form/q-form actions for this row both being "nas". Stacked as
! NASALMINSERTmat (NASAL resolves first, deleting itself either way;
! only THEN does MINSERT check what's now immediately before it, so a
! q-that-became-r correctly reads as a consonant and blocks the
! m-insertion -- same "must run after upstream marker resolution"
! ordering discipline as VVNG's own comment above).
!
! t-final stems ("qanuimmat" = qanuit/1v's own t -> m, "taimaimmat"
! same) need a THIRD mechanism: a general unmarked "t -> m" rule
! (phonology.xfscript, same family as the existing t->n/k->t/p->t
! total-regressive-assimilation rules), placed at the very end so it
! only fires once both markers above have already resolved and literal
! "mat"'s own "m" is truly adjacent. "imaimmat" (root "ima", tagged 1a)
! is NOT attempted: the Kotlin gold standard's own comment on this word
! says the original iutools analyzer couldn't decompose it either ("ima"
! isn't a known root) -- not a genuine V-context target.
++mat+tv-caus-4s:NASALMINSERTmat # ;

! "mata"/tv-caus-4p: Endings_verb.csv's row is the plural sibling of
! "mat"/tv-caus-4s directly above -- same V-form action pair ("i(ng)"/
! "i(m)", same "i(m)" confirmed via gold: "amisuummata"/"qaujimammata"
! both need plain "m"), same t-form "a" (Assimilation, the general t->m
! rule above), same k-form/q-form "nas" (NASAL). Reuses the identical
! marker stack, just the literal's own trailing vowel differs.
++mata+tv-caus-4p:NASALMINSERTmata # ;

! "jara"/tv-ger-1s-3s ("I...it", 1s subject/3s object gerundive):
! Endings_verb.csv's V-context is a single clean candidate (Neutral,
! bare "jara"); every gold example in this cluster attaches to a
! vowel-final stem. t/k/q-form ("tara", also Neutral -- own literal
! spelling, not the general j->t rule, though it'd give the same result)
! not attempted: unattested in this corpus.
++jara+tv-ger-1s-3s:jara # ;

! "tillugit"/tv-part-3p (participle, 3rd person plural object, no
! specific subject) -- clean single V-context candidate per
! Endings_verb_participle.csv (Neutral, bare "tillugit"), needed by
! "katimatuinnaqtillugit" (tuinnaq/1vv -> tillugit directly).
++tillugit+tv-part-3p:tillugit # ;

++jut+tv-ger-3p:jut # ;

! "makkuktut" (root "makkuk", k-final) needs the bulk-generated "tut"
! (j->t already converted) with its own preceding k preserved, NOT
! assimilated to "makkuttut" -- same KGUARD trick as juq/1vn's
! "KGUARDtu" above. Not decomposable by the real Java analyzer either
! (confirmed via --pipeline).
++jut+tv-ger-3p:KGUARDtut # ;

! "junga"/tv-ger-1s: "quviattunga" = {quviat:quviak/1v}
! {tunga:junga/tv-ger-1s} -- identical V/t/k/q shape to "jut"/tv-ger-3p
! above: all single-candidate Neutral, reuses the existing
! j->t-after-t/k/q rule unchanged, no new mechanism at all.
++junga+tv-ger-1s:junga # ;

! "lugu"/tv-part-1s-3s-prespas and "lugit"/tv-part-1s-3p-prespas:
! "isumagillugu" = {isuma:isuma/1n}{gi:gi/1nv}{llugu:lugu/tv-part-1s-3s-
! prespas} and "katillugit" = {kati:kati/1v}{llugit:lugit/tv-part-1s-3p-
! prespas}. V-context only (both dialect variants in
! Endings_verb_participle.csv agree: V-form is the bare morpheme text with
! action "i(l)" -- Insertion of "l" -- UNCONDITIONALLY, not gated by
! anything the way VVNG's insertion is). Since this insertion never varies
! by what precedes in the V-context, it's baked directly into the literal
! lower-side text ("llugu"/"llugit", canonical "lugu"/"lugit") rather than
! implemented as a rule -- no marker needed. t/k/q-contexts differ by
! dialect (North Baffin vs Cumberland Peninsula use different forms) and
! aren't attempted.
++lugu+tv-part-1s-3s-prespas:llugu # ;

! "lugu"/tv-part-1s-3s-fut: same V-context "l"-insertion shape as the
! prespas sibling above (baked-in "llugu", unconditional insertion, no
! marker). Additionally needed a SUPPR-prefixed variant for
! consonant-final stems: "malillugu" (root "malik", k-final) -- gold
! shows the preceding k simply deleted, "mali"+"llugu", not converted via
! VOICE despite the CSV's k-form action reading "son" (Voicing) --
! trusted the empirical gold string over the CSV action code here, same
! "gold overrides a misleading CSV cell" precedent as several suffixes in
! this file.
++lugu+tv-part-1s-3s-fut:llugu # ;
++lugu+tv-part-1s-3s-fut:SUPPRllugu # ;

++lugit+tv-part-1s-3p-prespas:llugit # ;

! "maliktugit" (root "malik", k-final) needs a THIRD spelling, "tugit"
! (own leading "l" converted to "t" -- not the general j->t rule, which
! only affects j; a separate, unexplained "l"->"t" alternation of this
! suffix's own literal, same free-variant-spelling category as
! lutik/tv-part-3p-prespas's own "sutik" (l->s) sibling), PLUS KGUARD
! protection since the resulting k/t boundary would otherwise assimilate
! into "malittugit". Not decomposable by the real Java analyzer either
! (confirmed via --pipeline).
++lugit+tv-part-1s-3p-prespas:KGUARDtugit # ;

! "lugit"/tv-part-1s-3p-fut: same V-context "l"-insertion shape as
! "lugu"/tv-part-1s-3s-fut above, plus the same SUPPR-prefixed variant
! for consonant-final stems ("malillugit", root "malik", k-final -- same
! shape as "malillugu" above).
++lugit+tv-part-1s-3p-fut:llugit # ;
++lugit+tv-part-1s-3p-fut:SUPPRllugit # ;

! "lunga"/tv-part-1s-prespas (intransitive, no object): Endings_verb_
! participle.csv's V-form action is the same unmarked "i(l)" insertion
! as lugu/lugit's own V-context above, baked directly into the literal.
! Needed for "ministaullunga"/"qaujimallunga" (both vowel-final stems).
++lunga+tv-part-1s-prespas:llunga # ;

! "luta"/tv-part-1p-prespas (intransitive, no object): same shape as
! "lunga" directly above. Needed for "gavamaulluta".
++luta+tv-part-1p-prespas:lluta # ;

! "lutik"/tv-part-3p-prespas (intransitive, no object): V-context follows
! the same "i(l)" shape as its siblings above ("llutik"), but
! "katitsutik" (root "katit", t-final) needs a SEPARATE t-context literal
! ("sutik") the CSV's own "&utik"-placeholder cell doesn't spell out
! directly -- trusted the empirical gold surface over the ambiguous CSV
! notation, same precedent as "malillugu"'s own SUPPR variant above.
++lutik+tv-part-3p-prespas:llutik # ;
++lutik+tv-part-3p-prespas:sutik # ;

! "vugut"/tv-dec-1p: "niriuppugut" = {niriup:niriuk/1v}
! {pugut:vugut/tv-dec-1p} -- V-context Neutral (plain "vugut"); t/k-context
! both rewrite the suffix's own initial "v" to "p" (same PMARK mechanism
! as "vunga"/tv-dec-1s below, reused unchanged: v->p scoped by PMARK,
! plus the stem's own final consonant assimilates to match,
! "niriuk"->"niriup"). q-context is a genuinely different ambiguous
! 2-candidate case ("pugut qugut"), skipped -- NOTE: the more "obvious"
! example word "angiqpugut" (root "angiq", q-final) actually needs this
! blocked q-context, not the clean k-context the CSV row's k-form gives
! -- caught by checking which context the root's own final letter
! actually selects, not just eyeballing the surface.
++vugut+tv-dec-1p:vPMARKugut # ;

! "vunga"/tv-dec-1s: "nikuvippunga" = {nikuvip:nikuvik/1v}
! {punga:vunga/tv-dec-1s} -- V-context Neutral (plain "vunga"); t/k-context
! both rewrite the suffix's own initial "v" to "p" (Assimilation, single
! candidate "punga" in both) -- same *shape* as the j->t rule (a direct
! letter-triggered rewrite) but v->p instead of j->t, triggered by [t|k]
! not [t|k|q] (q-context is a genuinely different, ambiguous 2-candidate
! case: "punga qunga", skipped).
!
! UNLIKE j->t, this one needs a marker (PMARK, phonology.xfscript): a
! blank "v -> p || [t|k] _" would be the ONLY v-initial morpheme in this
! lexicon, so it would work by accident -- but the SECOND effect visible
! in the target word (the stem's own final consonant also assimilates,
! "nikuvik"->"nikuvip", not "nikuvikpunga" -- same shape as the general
! t->n rule, just k->p instead of t->n, triggered by the newly-rewritten
! "p") is NOT safe to write as a blanket "k -> p || _ p": root "makpiq"
! has its own internal "kp" cluster, and "makpigaq" (see "gaq"/1vn's
! comment in VnSuffixes above) already validated that this "k" must NOT
! change in that word. PMARK scopes both rewrites to
! specifically-this-suffix's-own-"p", not any "p" that happens to follow
! a "k".
!
! q-context deferred as noted; t-context's stem-side assimilation (if
! any) is unconfirmed by any gold example in this lexicon and not
! guessed at.
++vunga+tv-dec-1s:vPMARKunga # ;

! "vuq"/tv-dec-3s (declarative, 3rd person singular): same shape as
! vunga/vugut above: V-context Neutral (plain "vuq"), t/k-context reuses
! the EXISTING PMARK mechanism unchanged ("naammappuq" = "naamak"+
! PMARK(v->p, k->p)+"uq"). q-context needed one more literal candidate,
! "puq": Endings_verb.csv gives TWO q-context options (puq/Neutral,
! quq/Voicing) -- same ambiguity shape that left vunga/vugut's own
! q-context deferred -- but "nuqqaqpuq" attests "puq" specifically, so
! only that one candidate is wired (as its own literal, NOT by widening
! PMARK's v->p trigger to include q, which would also affect
! vunga/vugut's still-deferred ambiguity).
++vuq+tv-dec-3s:vuq # ;
++vuq+tv-dec-3s:vPMARKuq # ;
++vuq+tv-dec-3s:puq # ;

! Four more tv-endings:
!   - "jugut"/tv-ger-1p ("angiqtugut"): same shape as jut/junga/jutit
!     (all single-candidate Neutral, V-form "jugut" literal, q-context
!     "tugut" falls out of the existing j->t rule for free -- no new
!     marker).
!   - "jutit"/tv-ger-2s ("qujannamiingujutit"): same shape again, reached
!     via "u"/1nv's own TvEndings continuation above.
!   - "gama"/tv-caus-1s, "gapta"/tv-caus-1p, "gavit"/tv-caus-2s
!     ("qaujimagama"/"qaujimagatta"/"qaujimagavit"): Endings_verb.csv's
!     "caus" rows are single-candidate Neutral in the V-context (root
!     "qaujima" is vowel-final, so only V-context is exercised);
!     t/k/q-contexts differ per ending (some Assimilation, one
!     "rama"/Fusion -- an unbuilt mechanism) and aren't attempted here,
!     matching this project's minimal-scope policy of only wiring the
!     context an actual gold word needs.
++jugut+tv-ger-1p:jugut # ;
++jutit+tv-ger-2s:jutit # ;
++gama+tv-caus-1s:gama # ;

! "uqaqqaugamailaak" needs "gama"/tv-caus-1s to ALSO reach QParticles
! (ilaak/1e's own enclitic can follow a fully-inflected verb, same
! established pattern as "ga"/tn-nom-s-1s etc above on the noun side).
++gama+tv-caus-1s:gama QParticles ;
++gapta+tv-caus-1p:gapta # ;
++gavit+tv-caus-2s:gavit # ;

! "git"/tv-imp-2s: see "suk"/1vv's comment in VvSuffixes above for the
! full imperative-mood investigation. k-context, Fusion == SUPPR reused,
! deletes suk's own trailing k: "tunngasu"+"git" = "tunngasugit".
++git+tv-imp-2s:git # ;
++git+tv-imp-2s:SUPPRgit # ;

! "gipsi"/tv-imp-2p ("tunngasugitsi"): the CSV's own k-form is literally
! "gipsi" (Fusion), but the gold surface is "...gitsi", not "...gipsi"
! -- an unexplained p->t-before-s alternation this row doesn't document
